Hawaii statutes.
[PART I.
GENERALLY]

Revision Note

Part heading added pursuant to §23G-15.

§666-1 Summary possession on termination or
forfeiture of lease. Whenever any lessee or tenant of any lands or
tenements, or any person holding under the lessee or tenant, holds possession
of lands or tenements without right, after the termination of the tenancy,
either by passage of time or by reason of any forfeiture, under the conditions
or covenants in a lease, or, if a tenant by parol, by a notice to quit of at
least ten days, the person entitled to the premises may be restored to the
possession thereof in [the] manner hereinafter provided. [CC 1859, §939; am L
1864, p 14; RL 1925, §2778; RL 1935, §4013; RL 1945, §10401; RL 1955, §240-1;
HRS §666-1; am L 1972, c 90, §8(a)]

Cross References

Acceptance of rent during litigation, see §666-5.

Jurisdiction of district court, see §§604-5, 666-6.

Rules of Court

Raising of dispute as to title in summary possession action,
requisites, see DCRCP rule 12.1.

Case Notes

Generally.

Statutory remedy not exclusive but is cumulative with
ejectment. 3 H. 127 (1869); 26 H. 661, 664 (1922).

Lessor desiring to oust tenant for nonpayment of rent must
pursue proper legal procedure or run risk of liability. 5 H. 548 (1886).

Requirements for surrender of lease by operation of law. 9
H. 384 (1894).

Pendency of prior action of ejectment not ground for
abatement of subsequent summary possession action between same parties. 11 H.
416 (1898).

Holdover without protest after notice of increased rent. 30
H. 29 (1927).

Forfeiture of lease--waiver of right of, estoppel to enforce;
relief against. 44 H. 543, 356 P.2d 379 (1960).

Surrender of lease by written document, when effective. 45
H. 445, 370 P.2d 463 (1962).

Termination of month-to-month tenancy by the landlord and
award of possession to landlord by the court do not constitute impairment of
First Amendment rights of the tenant, even if landlord is motivated by
landlord's disagreement with the actions and speech of tenant. 54 H. 417, 508
P.2d 1217 (1973).

Pursuant to §521-3(b) in case of conflict between chapter 521
and this section, chapter 521 will control. 63 H. 110, 621 P.2d 971 (1980).

Commercial landlord not precluded from self-help eviction for
nonpayment of rent. 67 H. 252, 686 P.2d 12 (1984).

Section cannot be used by a tenant against a
landlord. 72 H. 117, 809 P.2d 1130 (1991).

Where defendant licensee's license terminated on last day of
licensor's interest in property, on the following day, defendant was a
trespasser without right to possession; as such, defendant was not entitled to
any notice to vacate from landlord. 109 H. 296, 126 P.3d 339 (2006).

See 12 H. 291 (1899); 21 H. 270 (1912); 22 H. 129 (1914).

Acceptance of rent.

After knowledge of prior breach of condition is waiver of
right to forfeiture. 3 H. 274, 285 (1871); 5 H. 242 (1884); 10 H. 408 (1896);
25 H. 253, 263-265 (1919); 43 H. 281 (1959). But where continuing covenants
and continuing breaches, it operates as waiver only up to time of such
acceptance. 10 H. 408 (1896); 12 H. 291, 297-298 (1899). Right to declare
forfeiture for breach of covenant against making alterations without consent
and to pay taxes waived by acceptance of rent with knowledge of breach. 25 H.
253, 263-265 (1919). Waiver of forfeiture does not imply waiver of breach of
covenant and vice versa. 25 H. 253, 265 (1919).

Conditions and covenants.

Condition against subletting not broken by joint occupancy of
one room by physician as physician's office where lease was of land alone and
allowed tenant to remove buildings upon termination of lease. 3 H. 127
(1869). Original covenants no part of lease for additional term, unless so
stipulated. 3 H. 127, 139 (1869). Under the lease; lessor agreed to pay "the
taxes levied on" and the lessees "all other charges", held sewer
rates are payable by lessees. 20 H. 335 (1910). Where lessor has right to
withdraw a portion from lease, refusal by lessee, after notice, to part with
possession is a breach and grounds for forfeiture and landlord may proceed
under this chapter. 24 H. 165 (1917). Covenant to pay taxes, water rates, and
assessments includes assessments for street improvements and failure to pay
same constituted breach of covenant. 25 H. 178 (1919). Covenant requiring
lessee to make such repairs as are required by law, not broken unless such
repairs are required by law. 25 H. 253, 256 (1919). Covenant to repair not
breached where lease required tenant to repair all defects of which notice
should be given, within thirty days after such notice. 25 H. 253, 258 (1919).
Covenant against assignment not broken by execution of mortgage covering
leasehold (where mortgagor retains possession). 26 H. 63, 64-66 (1921).
Restrictions against assignments, not favored and are liberally construed in
favor of lessees. 26 H. 118, 120 (1921). Words "Permitted assigns"
used in habendum clause held no restriction against assignments. 26 H. 118
(1921). Assignment and sublease distinguished. 26 H. 489 (1922). Government
leases--liability of lessees, under covenant to pay taxes. 30 H. 334 (1928).
Covenant to deliver possession breached by sublessee's refusal to quit and
renders lessee liable to all damages occasioned therefrom. 30 H. 853 (1929).
For items of such damage, see 30 H. 853 (1929). "Renewal or
Extension" construed. 30 H. 871 (1929). Covenant against cutting or
destroying India and algaroba trees except in case of necessity, permits
removal of such trees for purpose of locating a houselot, garden plots, cattle
corrals, hog pens, and chicken runs. 31 H. 720 (1930). Lease prohibiting waste
not breached by removal of cactus in order to grow pineapples. 31 H. 720
(1930). Covenant to repair or replace, breached. 39 H. 448 (1952).

In lease of dwellings, there is implied warranty of
habitability and fitness for use intended. 51 H. 426, 462 P.2d 470 (1969).
Implied warranty of habitability applies to unfurnished as well as furnished
dwellings. 51 H. 473, 462 P.2d 482 (1969).

Subleases and assignments; rights and liabilities of parties
for payment of rent. 51 H. 493, 464 P.2d 285 (1970).

Damages.

Measure of damages recoverable by owner for prospective
lessee's breach is excess of rent over fair market value. 56 H. 507, 542 P.2d
1265 (1975).

Defenses.

Equitable defenses. 19 H. 190, 191 (1908); 26 H. 642,
644-647 (1922).

Tenant may show that subsequent to commencement of tenancy
landlord's title passed to another upon foreclosure of mortgage. 27 H. 631
(1923).

Retaliatory eviction. 59 H. 104, 577 P.2d 326 (1978).

Tenant may assert breach of implied warranty of habitability
as defense, when. 61 H. 144, 598 P.2d 161 (1979).

Demand.

For payment of taxes is not prerequisite to the right
to declare a forfeiture for their nonpayment. 15 H. 632 (1904); 21 H. 123, 127
(1912); 25 H. 253, 262 (1919). Demand for rent before claiming a forfeiture
may be waived in the lease. 15 H. 632 (1904).

Forfeiture.

Forfeiture clause strictly construed. 3 H. 127 (1869); 25 H.
253 (1919). Breach of condition subsequent in a deed does not work a
forfeiture but gives the grantor the right to declare a forfeiture. 11 H. 330
(1898). Acceptance of a lease from a stranger for a part or the whole of the
demised premises is ground for a forfeiture of the prior lease. 13 H. 637
(1901). Breach of covenant does not work a forfeiture unless lease contains
provision for forfeiture and re-entry. 26 H. 279 (1922).

Issues and proof.

Plaintiff must prove that relation of landlord and tenant
exists or has existed and that plaintiff is entitled to immediate possession.
21 H. 270, 273 (1912); 22 H. 739 (1915).

Primary question is restoration of possession. 22 H. 129
(1914).

Jurisdiction.

Only where relation of landlord and tenant confessedly
existed. 3 H. 768, 775-776 (1877); 4 H. 154, 157 (1879); 6 H. 407 (1883); 22
H. 129, 130 (1914); 24 H. 176 (1918); 24 H. 546, 555 (1918). Denial of tenancy
and setting up title hostile to plaintiff's title oust jurisdiction of district
magistrates. 4 H. 154, 157-158 (1879); 22 H. 129 (1914); 24 H. 176 (1918); 24
H. 546, 555 (1918). In action to recover rent tenant may in certain cases
challenge landlord's title to land. 10 H. 289 (1896). Defendant may show
relation of landlord and tenant has ceased to exist, and that landlord's title
has terminated; but, instant title comes into question, jurisdiction of
district court ceases. 21 H. 270, 273 (1912). See 9 H. 225 (1893).
Sufficiency of affidavit required by Sup. Ct. rule 14 to support plea that
title to real property is involved. 18 H. 640 (1908); 23 H. 65 (1915); 29 H.
336 (1926); 30 H. 160 (1927).

Notice.

If forfeiture is to be enforced tenant is entitled to
notice. 13 H. 637 (1901). Notice to quit essential if lease voidable at
landlord's option. 3 H. 127 (1869); 3 H. 274 (1871). After ten days' written
notice to quit, tenant at will has no further right to possession. 26 H. 661
(1922).

Parties.

Lessor's grantee may maintain action for summary possession
upon a forfeiture for breach of condition. 3 H. 274 (1871); 10 H. 408 (1896);
20 H. 712 (1911). Vendee at foreclosure sale may bring summary proceedings
where lease made subject to mortgage and to be annulled upon foreclosure sale.
5 H. 98 (1884). Mortgagee of lessee properly joined as codefendant when in
possession. 12 H. 291 (1899). Government may bring summary proceedings to
recover possession of crown land upon breach of covenant to pay rent. 18 H.
640 (1908). Summary proceedings cannot be maintained by owner of undivided
interest without alleging lessee is not owner of other interest. 19 H. 65
(1908). See also 22 H. 174 (1914).

Recoupment.

30 H. 434 (1928).

Relief against forfeiture.

Equity will relieve against forfeitures for nonpayment of
rent. 1 H. 102 (1853); 6 H. 435 (1883); 10 H. 408, 411 (1896); 21 H. 123, 126
(1912). Other grounds for relief. 25 H. 494, 502-503 (1920). In absence of
fraud, accident, mistake or surprise equity will not relieve for breach of
covenant to repair. 27 H. 812 (1924).

Cited: 13 H. 385, 386 (1901); 37 H. 14, 15 (1944); 41 H.
124, 135 (1955).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next